Massachusetts, session 194th, H2494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 51 ½ the
following section:-
Section 51 ¾. As used in this section, “pain medication” shall mean any opioid as
defined in section 1 of chapter 94C, benzodiazepine, barbiturate or any other prescription
medication for the treatment of pain that is likely to show up in the results of a urinalysis drug
test.
A treating clinician, prior to prescribing or dispensing pain medication to a patient
presenting in an acute-care hospital or satellite emergency facility as those terms are defined in
section 52 ½ , shall ask said patient, to the extent possible , the following questions:
of 2

“Are you currently on probation?”
“Are you currently required to take court mandated drug tests as a condition of your
probation?”
If the patient answers in the affirmative to both such questions, the treating clinician shall
administer a urinalysis drug test prior to the prescribing or dispensing of any pain medication.
The treating clinician shall inform the patient that the results of the drug test will be shared with
the department of probation. If the patient answers in the negative to either question, or to both
questions, the treating clinician shall not administer a drug test pursuant to this section.
If the patient answers in the affirmative to both such questions and submits to a drug test
as required by this section, the treating clinician shall, in a timely manner, provide the
department of probation with: (i) the patient’s name, (ii) the responses to the questions and
results of the drug test administered pursuant to this section, and (iii) a copy of the prescription
for any pain medication the clinician prescribed or dispensed.
This section shall not affect the treating clinician’s diagnosis and treatment of the patient,
including the prescribing or dispensing of pain medication, and shall not prevent a treating
clinician from dispensing pain medication as necessary to a patient in need of urgent medical
treatment.
of 2